Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-808
Prohibited acts.

Any president, director, treasurer, officer, corporator, partner, member, associate, or agent of such corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association who does in its behalf anything prohibited by sections 59-801 to 59-831 or who supports, votes for, aids and abets, or takes part in doing such action by the corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association, or any instrumentality thereof, shall be liable to the penalties by law provided.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 9, p. 639;

R.S.1913, § 4053;

C.S.1922, § 3456;

C.S.1929, § 59-809;

R.S.1943, § 59-808;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 363;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 2.